Vermont, session 2025-2026, S130.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2857 is amended to read:
§ 2857. VERMONT NATIONAL GUARD TUITION BENEFIT PROGRAM
(a) Program creation. The Vermont National Guard Tuition Benefit
Program (Program) is created, under which a member of the Vermont National
Guard (member) who meets the eligibility requirements in subsection (c) of
this section is entitled to the following tuition benefit for up to full-time
attendance:
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 2 of 9
(1) For courses at any Vermont State College institution or the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College (UVM), the benefit shall
be the in-state residence tuition rate for the relevant institution.
(2) For courses at any eligible Vermont private postsecondary
institution, the benefit shall be the in-state tuition rate charged by UVM.
(3) For courses at an eligible training institution offering nondegree,
certificate training, or continuing education programs, the benefit shall be the
lower of the institution’s standard tuition or the in-state tuition rate charged by
UVM.
(4) For courses at a non-Vermont approved postsecondary education
institution approved for federal Title IV funding where the degree program is
not available in Vermont, the benefit shall be the in-state tuition rate charged
by UVM.
(b) Tuition benefit.
(1) The tuition benefit provided under the Program shall be paid on
behalf of the member by the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation
(VSAC), subject to the appropriation of funds by the General Assembly
specifically for this purpose. An eligible Vermont postsecondary institution
that accepts or receives the tuition benefit on behalf of a member shall charge
the member the tuition rate for an in-state student. The amount of tuition for a
member who attends an educational institution under the Program on less than
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 3 of 9
a full-time basis shall be reduced to reflect the member’s course load in a
manner determined by VSAC under subdivision (f)(1) of this section.
(2) The tuition benefit shall be conditioned upon the member’s
executing a promissory note obligating the member to repay the member’s
tuition benefit, in whole or in part, if the member fails to complete the period
of Vermont National Guard service required in subsection (d) of this section,
or if the member’s benefit is terminated pursuant to subdivision (e)(1) of this
section. If the member is pursuing a graduate degree under the Program, the
member shall agree in the promissory note to, upon receipt of the graduate
degree and until the individual’s service commitment under subsection (d) of
this section is satisfied, be employed full time in Vermont or, if unemployed,
be actively seeking full-time employment in Vermont.
(c) Eligibility.
(1) To be eligible for the Program, an individual, whether a resident or
nonresident, shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
(A) be an active member of the Vermont National Guard;
(B) have successfully completed basic training;
(C) be enrolled at UVM, a Vermont State College, or any other
college or university located in Vermont in a program that leads to an
undergraduate certificate or, a baccalaureate degree, or a graduate degree, or at
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 4 of 9
an eligible training institution in a program that leads to a certificate or other
credential recognized by VSAC;
(D) have not previously earned an undergraduate bachelor’s degree
that was funded under the Program or any other State funding source
designated exclusively for members of the Vermont National Guard;
(E) continually demonstrate satisfactory academic progress as
determined by criteria established by the Vermont National Guard and VSAC,
in consultation with the educational institution at which the individual is
enrolled under the Program;
(F) have used available post-September 11, 2001 tuition benefits and
other federally funded military tuition assistance; provided, however, that this
subdivision shall not apply to:
(i) tuition benefits and other federally funded military tuition
assistance for which the individual has not yet earned the full amount of the
benefit or tuition;
(ii) Montgomery GI Bill benefits;
(iii) post-September 11, 2001 educational program housing
allowances;
(iv) federal educational entitlements;
(v) National Guard scholarship grants;
(vi) loans under section 2856 of this title; and
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 5 of 9
(vii) other nontuition benefits; and
(G) have submitted a statement of good standing to VSAC signed by
the individual’s commanding officer within 30 days prior to the beginning of
each semester.
(2) An individual may receive more than one undergraduate certificate
or other credential recognized by VSAC under the Program, provided that the
cost of all certificates and credentials received by the individual under the
Program does not exceed the full-time in-state tuition rate charged by UVM for
completion of an undergraduate baccalaureate degree.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1)(D) of this section, an individual
may pursue a graduate degree under the Program even if the individual has
received an undergraduate baccalaureate degree under the Program.
(d) Service commitment.
(1) For each full academic year of attendance under the Program, a
member shall be required to serve two years in the Vermont National Guard in
order to receive the full tuition benefit under the Program.
(2) If a member’s service with the Vermont National Guard terminates
before the member fulfills this two-year service commitment, other than for
good cause as determined by the Vermont National Guard, the individual shall
reimburse VSAC a pro rata portion of the tuition paid under the Program
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 6 of 9
pursuant to the terms of an interest-free reimbursement promissory note signed
by the individual at the time of entering the Program.
(3) For members participating in the Program on a less than full-time
basis, the member’s service commitment shall be at the rate of one month of
Vermont National Guard service commitment for each credit hour, not to
exceed 12 months of service commitment for a single semester.
(e) Termination of tuition benefit.
(1) The Office of the Vermont Adjutant and Inspector General may
terminate the tuition benefit provided an individual under the Program if:
(A) the individual’s commanding officer revokes the statement of
good standing submitted pursuant to subdivision (c)(7) of this section as a
result of an investigation or disciplinary action that occurred after the statement
of good standing was issued;
(B) the individual is dismissed from the educational institution in
which the individual is enrolled under the Program for academic or
disciplinary reasons; or
(C) the individual withdraws without good cause from the
educational institution in which the individual is enrolled under the Program;
or
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 7 of 9
(D) the individual has earned a graduate degree under the Program
and fails to satisfy the work requirement contained in subdivision (b)(2) of this
section.
(2) If an individual’s tuition benefit is terminated pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the individual shall reimburse VSAC for the
tuition paid under the Program, pursuant to the terms of an interest-free
reimbursement promissory note signed by the individual at the time of entering
the Program; shall be responsible on a pro rata basis for the remaining tuition
cost for the current semester or any courses in which the individual is currently
enrolled; and shall be ineligible to receive future tuition benefits under the
Program.
(3) If an individual is dismissed for academic or disciplinary reasons
from any postsecondary educational institution before receiving tuition
benefits under the Program, the Office of the Adjutant and Inspector General
may make a determination regarding the individual’s eligibility to receive
tuition benefits under the Program.
(f) Adoption of policies, procedures, and guidelines.
(1) VSAC, in consultation with the Office of the Adjutant and Inspector
General, shall adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines necessary to
implement the provisions of this section, which shall include eligibility,
application, and acceptance requirements,; proration of service requirements
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 8 of 9
for academic semesters or attendance periods shorter than one year,; data
sharing guidelines,; and the criteria for determining “good cause” as used in
subdivisions (d)(2) and (e)(1)(C) of this section.
(2) Each educational institution participating in the Program shall adopt
policies and procedures for the enrollment of members under the Program.
These policies and procedures shall be consistent with the policies, procedures,
and guidelines adopted by VSAC under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(g) Reports.
(1) On or before November 1 of each year, the President, Chancellor, or
equivalent position of each educational institution that participated in the
Program during the immediately preceding school year shall report to the
Vermont National Guard and VSAC regarding the number of members
enrolled at its institution during that school year who received tuition benefits
under the Program and, to the extent available, the courses or program in
which the members were enrolled.
(2) On or before January 15 of each year, the Vermont National Guard
and VSAC shall report these data and other relevant performance factors,
including information pertaining to the achievement of the goals of this
entitlement program and the costs of the Program to date, to the Governor, the
House and Senate Committees on Education, and the House Committees on
Appropriations and on General, Housing, and Military Affairs. The provisions
VT LEG #381809 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.130
2025 Page 9 of 9
of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), expiration of reports, shall not apply to the reports to be
made under this subsection.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381809 v.1